Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20182-3755
Dry beans; fee; adjustment; payment.

(1) Beginning August 1, 1987, there shall be paid to the commission a fee of six cents per hundredweight upon all dry beans grown in the state during 1987 and thereafter and sold through commercial channels. Beginning January 1, 1989, until July 31, 2015, the commission may, whenever it determines that the fees provided by this section are yielding more or less than is required to carry out the intent and purposes of the Dry Bean Resources Act, reduce or increase such fee for such period as it shall deem justifiable, but not less than one year and not to exceed ten cents per hundredweight.

(2) Beginning August 1, 2015, the fee imposed by this section shall be fifteen cents per hundredweight. Beginning January 1, 2017, the commission may, whenever it determines that the fees provided by this section are yielding more or less than is required to carry out the intent and purposes of the act, reduce or increase such fee for such period as it shall deem justifiable, but not less than one year and not to exceed twenty-four cents per hundredweight.

(3) Two-thirds of the fee levied under this section shall be paid by the grower at the time of sale or delivery and shall be collected by the first purchaser. The first purchaser shall pay the remaining one-third of the fee. No dry beans shall be subject to the fee more than once.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 21;

Laws 2015, LB242, § 2.